Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
OFFENSES - QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS

1-13-201. Interfering with or impeding registration.

Any person who intentionally interferes with or impedes the registration of electors, whether by act of commission or by failure to perform any act or duty imposed or required for the proper administration of parts 2 and 3 of article 2 of this title 1, or who knowingly permits or encourages another to do so upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111. A person who collects a voter registration application from an eligible elector for mailing or delivery to the county clerk and recorder and who fails to mail or deliver the application to the proper county clerk and recorder within five business days after the application is signed is guilty of a violation of this section; except that this section shall not apply to a voter registration drive circulator or voter registration drive organizer, who shall be subject to the penalties described in part 7 of article 2 of this title 1.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 430, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1425, § 54, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 1460, § 54, effective June 6.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 839, § 27, effective May 5.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3124, § 10, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-108 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-202. Unlawful qualification as taxpaying elector.

It is unlawful to take or place title to property in the name of another or to pay the taxes or to take or issue a tax receipt in the name of another for the purpose of attempting to qualify such person as a taxpaying elector or as a qualified taxpaying elector or to aid or assist any person to do so. The ballot of any person violating this section shall be void. Any person, company, corporation, or association violating this section shall forfeit and lose all rights, franchises, or other benefits accruing or to accrue to the benefit of such person, company, corporation, or association by or as the result of any such election. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 430, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3124, § 11, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-113 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-203. Procuring false registration.

It is unlawful for any person to procure his or her own name, or the name of any other person, to be registered in the statewide voter registration system for a precinct in which such person is not, at the time of such registration, entitled to be registered or for any person to procure any fictitious name to be registered in the statewide voter registration system. Any person who violates this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111. Each violation is considered a separate offense.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 431, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 852, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 588, § 68, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3125, § 12, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-114 and 1-30-119 as they existed prior to 1980.

1-13-204. Adding names after registration closed. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 431, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2016:

Entire section repealed, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 593, § 82, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former §§ 1-13-117 and 1-30-120 as they existed prior to 1980.

1-13-205. County clerk and recorder signing wrongful registration.

Every county clerk and recorder who willfully signs his or her name on the registration record opposite the name of any person knowing that said person is not legally entitled to be registered pursuant to the provisions of section 1-2-101 upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 431, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 638, § 79, effective May 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3125, § 13, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-115 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-206. Disposition of mail voter registration application. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 431, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 95:

Entire section repealed, p. 853, § 88, effective July 1.

1-13-207. Signature on registration record is proof of oath.

Any elector, election official, or other person, by his signature on the registration record, shall be conclusively deemed in law to have duly verified such registration record. The registration record containing such signature, or a copy thereof certified by the county clerk and recorder, shall be admissible in evidence as proof of the taking of an oath or affirmation as to the information contained therein in all criminal proceedings pursuant to sections 1-13-104, 1-13-203, and 1-13-205.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 431, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 638, § 80, effective May 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-116 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-208. Deputy county clerk and recorder - influencing party affiliation.

Any deputy county clerk and recorder for voter registration purposes, or employee of the department of revenue who is authorized to conduct voter registration at local driver's license examination facilities, or employee of a voter registration agency who is authorized to conduct voter registration who influences or attempts to influence any person during the registration process to affiliate with a political party or to affiliate with a specific political party upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 803, § 16, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1771, § 34, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3125, § 14, effective March 1, 2022.

1-13-209. High school deputy registrar - influencing party affiliation.

Any high school deputy registrar for voter registration purposes who influences or attempts to influence any person during the registration process to affiliate with a political party or to affiliate with a specific political party upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 623, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1435, § 121, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3125, § 15, effective March 1, 2022.